Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
ARTICLE 1
COMMON PROVISIONS

Section

44-1-101. Short title.

The short title of this title 44 is the "Department of Revenue Activities Regulation Act".

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire title added, effective October 1. (For the 9 bills that added this title 44 and their locations in the 2018 Session Laws, see the editor's note following the title 44 heading.)

44-1-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

Before the enactment of this title 44, laws administered by the department of revenue that regulate a variety of activities were codified in two titles of the Colorado Revised Statutes, most prominently in title 12, which governs professions and occupations;

Most professions and occupations are regulated by the department of regulatory agencies pursuant to title 12, but prior to the 2017 legislative session, title 12 contained numerous laws that did not pertain to the regulation of professions and occupations and were not administered by the department of regulatory agencies;

With the enactment of section 2-3-510 in 2016, the general assembly directed the office of legislative legal services to study an organizational recodification of title 12 of the Colorado Revised Statutes, including relocating laws that do not pertain to professions and occupations and are not administered by the department of regulatory agencies;

Based on recommendations from the title 12 recodification study, the general assembly enacted several bills in the 2017 legislative session to relocate out of title 12 many laws that are administered by entities other than the department of regulatory agencies;

The study also recommended creating a new title 44 for purposes of consolidating laws administered by the department of revenue that regulate activities into a single title in order to facilitate both:

The public's and regulated entities' understanding of the laws that apply to them; and

The department of revenue's administration of these laws; and

Creating a new title 44 consisting of laws administered by the department of revenue that regulate various activities is necessary to implement the recommendations of the title 12 recodification study and facilitate the reorganization of title 12 pertaining to the regulation of professions and occupations.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire title added, effective October 1. (For the 9 bills that added this title 44 and their locations in the 2018 Session Laws, see the editor's note following the title 44 heading.)

44-1-103. Definitions.

As used in this title 44, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Department" means the department of revenue created in section 24-1-117.

(1.5) (a) "Driver's history" means a driver's history record made and maintained in accordance with section 42-2-121 (2).

"Driver's history" does not include a misdemeanor or felony conviction, notwithstanding that the conviction is included within the driver's history record made and maintained in accordance with section 42-2-121 (2).

"Executive director" means the executive director of the department.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire title added, effective October 1. (For the 9 bills that added this title 44 and their locations in the 2018 Session Laws, see the editor's note following the title 44 heading.)

L. 2021:

(1.5) added, (SB 21-040), ch. 59, p. 240, § 4, effective September 7.

44-1-104. Use of driver's history for professional licensing, permit, or registration decisions.

When a person applies for a license, permit, or registration under this title 44, the department shall not consider an event in the applicant's driver's history when determining whether to issue to the applicant a new, renewal, or reinstated license, permit, or registration unless:

The event is relevant to the performance of the profession or occupation that is the subject of the application; and

The operation of a motor vehicle is a duty of the profession or occupation that is the subject of the application;

The event is a part of a pattern of behavior that is relevant to the performance of the profession or occupation that is the subject of the application; or

The event occurred within three years before the date that the applicant submitted the application to the department.

Unless subsection (2)(b) of this section applies, the department shall not consider an event within the driver's history of a license holder, permit holder, or registrant when determining:

(I) Whether to impose discipline;

(II) The type of discipline to impose; or

(III) The severity of discipline to impose.

The department may consider an event within a driver's history if:

The event is relevant to the performance of the profession or occupation for which the license holder, permit holder, or registrant is licensed, permitted, or registered; and

The operation of a motor vehicle is a duty of the profession or occupation for which the license holder, permit holder, or registrant is licensed, permitted, or registered;

The event is a part of a pattern of behavior that is relevant to the performance of the profession or occupation for which the license holder, permit holder, or registrant is licensed, permitted, or registered; or

The event occurred within three years before the act upon which the discipline is based.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-040), ch. 59, p. 241, § 5, effective September 7.

44-1-105. Feasibility report - regulation of kratom - prohibited acts - definition - rules - repeal.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "kratom product" means any product or ingredient containing:

Any part of the leaf of the mitragyna speciosa plant if the plant contains the alkaloid mitragynine or 7-hydroxymitragynine; or

A synthetic material that contains the alkaloid mitragynine or 7-hydroxymitragynine.

On or before January 4, 2023, the executive director shall submit to the general assembly a report analyzing the feasibility of regulating kratom products, kratom processors, and kratom retailers. The report must identify, consider, and recommend legislative action addressing the following subjects:

The appropriate state agency or agencies to regulate the manufacture, sale, offering for sale, possession, or use of kratom products;

Appropriate definitions of terms including "processing", "selling", "advertising", "kratom", and "kratom products";

Appropriate age restrictions for kratom purchasing and consumption;

Feasibility and enforcement of underage compliance checks;

A testing program for identifying kratom products;

An evaluation of the competencies and capabilities of existing private third-party laboratories to manage kratom testing;

The appropriate standards for laboratory accreditation and performance;

Testing requirements for identifying kratom that is offered for sale to a Colorado consumer;

Consideration of types of kratom products that are available as food, including tea powders, gummies, beverages, pills, capsules, and extracts;

The types of kratom products that should not be permitted to be sold or offered for sale;

Serving sizes and related restrictions;

Labeling requirements including a prohibition on unproven health or medical benefit claims;

Manufacturing processes and requirements for processors;

Current good manufacturing process requirements under regulations promulgated by the federal drug administration for any vendor processing kratom;

Adverse health-event reporting requirements and product recalls;

Advertising requirements, limitations, and prohibitions;

Tax and fee considerations;

Recordkeeping;

Traceability;

Criminal and administrative penalties for violations;

Recommendations regarding an operable timeline for implementation of a regulatory framework for kratom;

Fiscal impacts and resource requirements for implementation and ongoing administration of a regulatory program for kratom; and

Alternatives, including consumer protection requirements such as liability insurance requirements, prohibitions, and criminal penalties, to state regulation of kratom.

The department shall engage relevant stakeholders, including kratom processors, kratom consumers, kratom retailers, public health officials, legislative members, relevant state agencies with expertise in similar regulatory fields, local governments, and other interested stakeholders, in order to inform the feasibility report described in subsection (2)(a) of this section.

This subsection (2) is repealed, effective July 1, 2023.

Effective July 1, 2024, a person shall not:

Knowingly prepare, distribute, advertise, sell, or offer to sell a kratom product that is adulterated with fentanyl or any other controlled substance listed in part 2 of article 18 of title 18;

Sell a kratom product that does not have a label that clearly sets forth:

The identity and address of the manufacturer; and

The full list of ingredients in the kratom product;

Knowingly prepare, distribute, advertise, sell, or offer to sell a kratom product to a person under twenty-one years of age; or

Display or store kratom products in a retail location in a manner that will allow the products to be accessed by individuals under twenty-one years of age.

The executive director may promulgate rules that are necessary for the enforcement of subsection (3) of this section.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (SB 22-120), ch. 251, p. 1838, § 2, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 22-120, see section 1 of chapter 251, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.